test/src/gt-desc-yamls/case-endings-consonants-regular_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:
  
  # Nouns with consonant endings

  Standard nouns ending in -Vr:
    # Singular
    manar+N+Sing: manar
    manar+N+Sing+Nom: manar
    manar+N+Sing+Acc: manar
    manar+N+Sing+Gen: manaro
    manar+N+Sing+Ins: manarnen
    manar+N+Sing+All: manarenna
    manar+N+Sing+Dat: manaren
    manar+N+Sing+Loc: manaresse
    manar+N+Sing+Loc+Short: manares
    manar+N+Sing+Abl: manarello
    manar+N+Sing+Poss: manar{w}a
    # Dual
    manar+N+Dual: [manaret, manaru]
    manar+N+Dual+Nom: [manaret, manaru]
    manar+N+Dual+Acc: [manaret, manaru]
    manar+N+Dual+Gen: [manarto, manaruo]
    manar+N+Dual+Ins: [manarenten, manarunen]
    manar+N+Dual+All: [manarenta, manarunna]
    manar+N+Dual+Dat: [manarent, manarun, manaruen]
    manar+N+Dual+Loc: [manaretse, manarusse]
    manar+N+Dual+Loc+Short: manarus  # also manartes ???
    manar+N+Dual+Abl: [manarelto, manarullo]
    manar+N+Dual+Poss: ['manaret{w}a', 'manaru{w}a']
    # Plural
    manar+N+Plur: manari
    manar+N+Plur+Nom: manari
    manar+N+Plur+Acc: manari
    manar+N+Plur+Gen: manarion
    manar+N+Plur+Ins: manarinen
    manar+N+Plur+All: manarinnar
    manar+N+Plur+Dat: manarin
    manar+N+Plur+Loc: manarissen
    manar+N+Plur+Loc+Short: manaris
    manar+N+Plur+Abl: [manarillon, manarillor]
    manar+N+Plur+Poss: manari{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    manar+N+Plur+Par: manalli
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Nom: manalli
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Acc: manalli
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Gen: manallion
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Ins: manallínen
    manar+N+Plur+Par+All: [manallinnar, manallinna]
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Dat: manallin
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [manallissen, manallisse]
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: manallis
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [manallillon, manallillor, manallillo]
    manar+N+Plur+Par+Poss: manallí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -Vn:
    # Singular
    aran+N+Sing: aran
    aran+N+Sing+Nom: aran
    aran+N+Sing+Acc: aran
    aran+N+Sing+Gen: arano
    aran+N+Sing+Ins: arannen
    aran+N+Sing+All: aranenna
    aran+N+Sing+Dat: aranen
    aran+N+Sing+Loc: aranesse
    aran+N+Sing+Loc+Short: aranes
    aran+N+Sing+Abl: aranello
    aran+N+Sing+Poss: aran{w}a
    # Dual
    aran+N+Dual: [arant, aranu]
    aran+N+Dual+Nom: [arant, aranu]
    aran+N+Dual+Acc: [arant, aranu]
    aran+N+Dual+Gen: [aranto, aranuo]
    aran+N+Dual+Ins: [aranenten, aranunen]
    aran+N+Dual+All: [aranenta, aranunna]
    aran+N+Dual+Dat: [aranent, aranun, aranuen]
    aran+N+Dual+Loc: [aranetse, aranusse]
    aran+N+Dual+Loc+Short: aranus  # also arantes ???
    aran+N+Dual+Abl: [aranelto, aranullo]
    aran+N+Dual+Poss: ['aranet{w}a', 'aranu{w}a']
    # Plural
    aran+N+Plur: arani
    aran+N+Plur+Nom: arani
    aran+N+Plur+Acc: arani
    aran+N+Plur+Gen: aranion
    aran+N+Plur+Ins: araninen
    aran+N+Plur+All: araninnar
    aran+N+Plur+Dat: aranin
    aran+N+Plur+Loc: aranissen
    aran+N+Plur+Loc+Short: aranis
    aran+N+Plur+Abl: [aranillon, aranillor]
    aran+N+Plur+Poss: arani{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    aran+N+Plur+Par: [aralli, araneli]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Nom: [aralli, araneli]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Acc: [aralli, araneli]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Gen: [arallion, aranelion]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Ins: [arallínen, aranelínen]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+All: [arallinnar, arallinna, aranelinnar, aranelinna]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Dat: [arallin, aranelin]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [arallissen, arallisse, aranelissen, aranelisse]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: [arallis, aranelis]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [arallillon, arallillor, arallillo, aranelillon, aranelillor, aranelillo]
    aran+N+Plur+Par+Poss: ['arallí{w}a', 'aranelí{w}a']
  
  Standard nouns ending in -Vs:
    # Singular
    coimas+N+Sing: coimas
    coimas+N+Sing+Nom: coimas
    coimas+N+Sing+Acc: coimas
    coimas+N+Sing+Gen: coimaso
    coimas+N+Sing+Ins: coimasenen
    coimas+N+Sing+All: coimasenna
    coimas+N+Sing+Dat: coimasen
    coimas+N+Sing+Loc: coimasesse
    coimas+N+Sing+Loc+Short: coimases
    coimas+N+Sing+Abl: coimasello
    coimas+N+Sing+Poss: coimas{w}a
    # Dual
    coimas+N+Dual: [coimaset, coimasu]
    coimas+N+Dual+Nom: [coimaset, coimasu]
    coimas+N+Dual+Acc: [coimaset, coimasu]
    coimas+N+Dual+Gen: [coimasto, coimasuo]
    coimas+N+Dual+Ins: [coimasenten, coimasunen]
    coimas+N+Dual+All: [coimasenta, coimasunna]
    coimas+N+Dual+Dat: [coimasent, coimasun, coimasuen]
    coimas+N+Dual+Loc: [coimasetse, coimasusse]
    coimas+N+Dual+Loc+Short: coimasus  # also coimastes ???
    coimas+N+Dual+Abl: [coimaselto, coimasullo]
    coimas+N+Dual+Poss: ['coimaset{w}a', 'coimasu{w}a']
    # Plural
    coimas+N+Plur: coimasi
    coimas+N+Plur+Nom: coimasi
    coimas+N+Plur+Acc: coimasi
    coimas+N+Plur+Gen: coimasion
    coimas+N+Plur+Ins: coimasinen
    coimas+N+Plur+All: coimasinnar
    coimas+N+Plur+Dat: coimasin
    coimas+N+Plur+Loc: coimasissen
    coimas+N+Plur+Loc+Short: coimasis
    coimas+N+Plur+Abl: [coimasillon, coimasillor]
    coimas+N+Plur+Poss: coimasi{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    coimas+N+Plur+Par: [coimalli, coimaseli]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Nom: [coimalli, coimaseli]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Acc: [coimalli, coimaseli]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Gen: [coimallion, coimaselion]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Ins: [coimallínen, coimaselínen]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+All: [coimallinnar, coimallinna, coimaselinnar, coimaselinna]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Dat: [coimallin, coimaselin]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [coimallissen, coimallisse, coimaselissen, coimaselisse]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: [coimallis, coimaselis]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [coimallillon, coimallillor, coimallillo, coimaselillon, coimaselillor, coimaselillo]
    coimas+N+Plur+Par+Poss: ['coimallí{w}a', 'coimaselí{w}a']
  
  Standard nouns ending in -Vl:
    # Singular
    estel+N+Sing: estel
    estel+N+Sing+Nom: estel
    estel+N+Sing+Acc: estel
    estel+N+Sing+Gen: estelo
    estel+N+Sing+Ins: estelenen
    estel+N+Sing+All: estelenna
    estel+N+Sing+Dat: estelen
    estel+N+Sing+Loc: estelesse
    estel+N+Sing+Loc+Short: esteles
    estel+N+Sing+Abl: estelello
    estel+N+Sing+Poss: estel{w}a
    # Dual
    estel+N+Dual: [estelet, estelu]
    estel+N+Dual+Nom: [estelet, estelu]
    estel+N+Dual+Acc: [estelet, estelu]
    estel+N+Dual+Gen: [estelto, esteluo]
    estel+N+Dual+Ins: [estelenten, estelunen]
    estel+N+Dual+All: [estelenta, estelunna]
    estel+N+Dual+Dat: [estelent, estelun, esteluen]
    estel+N+Dual+Loc: [esteletse, estelusse]
    estel+N+Dual+Loc+Short: estelus  # also esteltes ???
    estel+N+Dual+Abl: [estelelto, estelullo]
    estel+N+Dual+Poss: ['estelet{w}a', 'estelu{w}a']
    # Plural
    estel+N+Plur: esteli
    estel+N+Plur+Nom: esteli
    estel+N+Plur+Acc: esteli
    estel+N+Plur+Gen: estelion
    estel+N+Plur+Ins: estelinen
    estel+N+Plur+All: estelinnar
    estel+N+Plur+Dat: estelin
    estel+N+Plur+Loc: estelissen
    estel+N+Plur+Loc+Short: estelis
    estel+N+Plur+Abl: [estelillon, estelillor]
    estel+N+Plur+Poss: esteli{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    estel+N+Plur+Par: estelli
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Nom: estelli
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Acc: estelli
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Gen: estellion
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Ins: estellínen
    estel+N+Plur+Par+All: [estellinnar, estellinna]
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Dat: estellin
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [estellissen, estellisse]
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: estellis
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [estellillon, estellillor, estellillo]
    estel+N+Plur+Par+Poss: estellí{w}a
  
  Standard nouns ending in -Vt:
    # Singular
    lirit+N+Sing: lirit
    lirit+N+Sing+Nom: lirit
    lirit+N+Sing+Acc: lirit
    lirit+N+Sing+Gen: lirito
    lirit+N+Sing+Ins: liritenen
    lirit+N+Sing+All: liritenna
    lirit+N+Sing+Dat: liriten
    lirit+N+Sing+Loc: liritesse
    lirit+N+Sing+Loc+Short: lirites
    lirit+N+Sing+Abl: liritello
    lirit+N+Sing+Poss: lirit{w}a
    # Dual
    lirit+N+Dual: [liritet, liritu]
    lirit+N+Dual+Nom: [liritet, liritu]
    lirit+N+Dual+Acc: [liritet, liritu]
    lirit+N+Dual+Gen: [liritto, lirituo]
    lirit+N+Dual+Ins: [liritenten, liritunen]
    lirit+N+Dual+All: [liritenta, liritunna]
    lirit+N+Dual+Dat: [liritent, liritun, lirituen]
    lirit+N+Dual+Loc: [liritetse, liritusse]
    lirit+N+Dual+Loc+Short: liritus  # also lirittes ???
    lirit+N+Dual+Abl: [liritelto, liritullo]
    lirit+N+Dual+Poss: ['liritet{w}a', 'liritu{w}a']
    # Plural
    lirit+N+Plur: liriti
    lirit+N+Plur+Nom: liriti
    lirit+N+Plur+Acc: liriti
    lirit+N+Plur+Gen: lirition
    lirit+N+Plur+Ins: liritinen
    lirit+N+Plur+All: liritinnar
    lirit+N+Plur+Dat: liritin
    lirit+N+Plur+Loc: liritissen
    lirit+N+Plur+Loc+Short: liritis
    lirit+N+Plur+Abl: [liritillon, liritillor]
    lirit+N+Plur+Poss: liriti{w}a
    # Partitive Plural
    lirit+N+Plur+Par: [liriteli, liriteli]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Nom: [liriteli, liriteli]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Acc: [liriteli, liriteli]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Gen: [liritelion, liritelion]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Ins: [liritelínen, liritelínen]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+All: [liritelinnar, liritelinna]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Dat: liritelin
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Loc: [liritelissen, liritelisse]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Loc+Short: liritelis
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Abl: [liritelillon, liritelillor, liritelillo]
    lirit+N+Plur+Par+Poss: liritelí{w}a
  
  # Words are also allowed to end in -nt,
  # but I haven't found any examples where the root ends like that,
  # so I'm not writing any tests.
